Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 31 Launderers’ and Cleaners’ Lien

34-31-1.
Lien for service and storage charges.

Every launderer or cleanser who shall launder, cleanse or store any article of apparel or other personal property at the request of the owner or legal possessor thereof shall have a lien on and may retain the possession of the article until the charges for such laundering, cleansing or storage have been paid.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3529, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-31-1

.

34-31-2.
Sale to enforce lien.

If the charge or charges remain unpaid for a period of at least six (6) months the launderer or cleanser may sell the article at private or public sale or may dispose of the article in any other manner. After the six-months period has expired the owner and/or legal possessor of the article shall have no further right, title, or interest in and to the article.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3529, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-31-2

; P.L. 1962, ch. 208, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 208, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 49, § 1.

34-31-3, 34-31-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3529, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-31-3

; P.L. 1962, ch. 208, § 1; G.L., § 34-31-4, as enacted by P.L. 1962, ch. 208, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1977, ch. 208, § 2.